Mississippi statutes. Title 77. Public Utilities and Carriers
Performance Bond; Insurance

§ 77-7-81.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1987, ch 309, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1987.

[Codes, 1942, § 7653; Laws, 1938, ch. 142]

§ 77-7-83.
Insurance required of certificate holders.

Each holder of a certificate authorizing operation as a common carrier by motor vehicle, or the holder of a contract permit issued by the commission, shall keep in force at all times an insurance policy or a certificate of insurance in lieu thereof, issued by some insurance company or association or other insurer authorized to transact business in this state, or bond or bonds, to be approved by the commission, in an amount required by the commission, conditioned to pay any final judgment against the carrier for personal injuries or property damage resulting from or arising out of the use, maintenance or operation of the motor vehicles of such carrier and suffered by any member of the public or by the state or any of its political subdivisions. The amount of the insurance policy or bond required by the commission under this section shall in no case be less than the insurance requirements of the United States Department of Transportation as set out in 49 CFR part 387.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7654; Laws, 1938, ch. 142; Laws, 1958, ch. 507; Laws, 1968, ch. 533, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch 561, § 10; Laws, 1995, ch. 338, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1995).

§ 77-7-85.
Insurance required of permit holders.

Each holder of a permit as a contract carrier by motor vehicle issued by the commission shall keep on file with the commission an insurance policy or a certificate of insurance in lieu thereof, issued by some insurance company or association or other insurer authorized to transact business in this state, or bond or bonds, to be approved by the commission, conditioned to pay any final judgment against said contract carrier for personal injuries or property damage resulting from or arising out of the use, maintenance or operation of the motor vehicles of such carrier, and suffered by any member of the public or by the state or any of its political subdivisions. However, such carrier shall not be required to file a policy of insurance or bond conditioned to pay the judgments on claims of its passengers, or shippers or patrons. The minimum amount of such insurance policy or bond shall be as provided in Section 77-7-83.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7654; Laws, 1938, ch. 142; Laws, 1958, ch. 507; Laws, 1968, ch. 533, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved July 8, 1968).

§ 77-7-87.
Insurance required of interstate carriers.

Each motor carrier holding certificates or permits from and operating under the authority of the Interstate Commerce Commission, in interstate business only, shall file and keep on file with the commission a policy or certificate of insurance, bond or certification of qualification as a self-insurer which complies with the Interstate Commerce Commission’s requirements for the single state insurance registration program, conditioned to pay any final judgment against such interstate carrier for personal injury or property damage resulting from or arising out of the use, maintenance or operation of the motor vehicles of such interstate carrier, and suffered by any member of the public, or by the state or any of its subdivisions. However, no interstate carrier shall be required to file insurance or bond conditioned to pay the judgments on claims of its passengers, shippers, or patrons. The minimum amount of the insurance policy, certificate or bond shall be as provided in 49 CFR part 387.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7655; Laws, 1938, ch. 142; Laws, 1968, ch. 534; Laws, 1993, ch 561, § 11, eff from and after October 1, 1993.

§ 77-7-89.
Insurance policy or bond shall not be cancelled until notice is given to commission.

The insurance policy or bond filed with the commission as required by this chapter, shall contain a provision or endorsement to the effect that the same shall not be cancelled for any cause by either party thereto unless and until ten (10) days’ written notice thereof shall have been given to the commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7654; Laws, 1938, ch. 142; Laws, 1958, ch. 507; Laws, 1968, ch. 533, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved July 8, 1968).

§ 77-7-91.
Actions against motor carriers and sureties.

In any action, whether in law or equity, against any motor carrier operating under the provisions of this chapter, whether such carrier is a common carrier, restricted motor carrier, contract carrier or an interstate carrier, the insurer, insurance company or obligor in the policy of insurance or bond given by such carrier in compliance with this chapter shall not be joined as a party to such suit and shall not be a proper party thereto except as hereinafter provided.

The insurer, insurance company or obligor, in any policy of insurance or bond filed in compliance with this chapter, shall be obligated to pay any final judgment obtained against any such carrier as provided in Sections 77-7-83 through 77-7-87, regardless of the solvency, insolvency, bankruptcy or receivership of such carrier.

In the event the insured shall abandon his permit or certificate and leave the state, a claimant asserting a claim within the provisions of said bond or policy may file suit against the sureties executing such bond or company issuing such policy in a court of competent jurisdiction without the necessity of making the insured a party to the said suit.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7654; Laws, 1938, ch. 142; Laws, 1958, ch. 507; Laws, 1968, ch. 533, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 338, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1995).

§ 77-7-93.
Effect of failure to comply with performance bond and insurance requirements.

The failure of any holder of a certificate or permit issued by and under the authority of the commission, to comply with any of the requirements of Section 77-7-83 shall be cause for the revocation or suspension of the certificate or permit, or for the imposition of a fine not exceeding One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or both. Failure of any holder of a certificate or permit issued by and under the authority of the Interstate Commerce Commission, to keep on file with the commission the insurance or other security provided by Section 77-7-87, shall be cause for prohibition of the use by the certificate or permit holder of any highway in this state, and shall be cause for the imposition of a fine not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00).

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7655; Laws, 1938, ch. 142; Laws, 1968, ch. 534; Laws, 1987, ch. 309, § 7; Laws, 1993, ch 561, § 12, eff from and after October 1, 1993.